Colorado, session 2026A, HB1210.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add (1)(ssss)
as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(ssss) VIOLATES PART 19 OF THIS ARTICLE 1.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 19 to article
1 of title 6 as follows:
PART 19
PROHIBITING INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE
AND WAGE SETTING USING SURVEILLANCE DATA
6-1-1901. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 19, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "BIOMETRICS" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS "BIOMETRIC
IDENTIFIER", AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303, AND INCLUDES BIOMETRIC
IDENTIFIERS ASSOCIATED WITH A WORKER.
(2) "CONSUMER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 6-1-732
(1)(d).
(3) "INDIVIDUALIZED" MEANS SPECIFIC TO OR INFERRED ABOUT AN
INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP, BAND, CLASS, OR TIER OF INDIVIDUALS WITH
PARTICULAR PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS, ONLINE BEHAVIORS, OR
BIOMETRICS.
(4) (a) "INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING" MEANS USING A PWSA OR
THE OUTPUT OF A PWSA IN DETERMINING A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER.
(b) "INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE USE OF
LOCATION DATA OR AN INTERNET PROTOCOL ADDRESS SOLELY FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE JURISDICTION WHERE AN INDIVIDUAL IS
LOCATED IF THE LOCATION DATA OR INTERNET PROTOCOL ADDRESS IS USED
SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(I) LIMITING OFFERED PRODUCTS OR SERVICES TO THOSE AVAILABLE
IN THAT JURISDICTION;
(II) DISPLAYING PRICES IN THE APPROPRIATE CURRENCY;
(III) CALCULATING JURISDICTION-SPECIFIC TAXES; OR
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(IV) COMPLYING WITH JURISDICTION-SPECIFIC DISCLOSURE OR
OTHER REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS.
(c) "INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING" DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY CREDIT
DECISION OR ACTION INVOLVING EVALUATION OF CREDITWORTHINESS,
INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, THE APPLICATION FOR CREDIT, THE
EXTENSION OR GRANTING OF CREDIT, THE DETERMINATION OF ACCOUNT
TERMS, OR THE REFUSAL TO EXTEND CREDIT OR TO ENTER INTO A FINANCIAL
TRANSACTION WITH A SPECIFIC CONSUMER, BY THE TRUE LENDER THAT IS AN
ENTITY WITH A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, OR CHARTER ISSUED BY THE UNITED
STATES OR ANY STATE, DISTRICT, TERRITORY, OR COMMONWEALTH OF THE
UNITED STATES, AND THAT:
(I) IS A MORTGAGE BROKER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 5-3.5-101; OR
(II) IS A TRUE LENDER AND EITHER:
(A) A MORTGAGE LOAN ORIGINATOR, MORTGAGE COMPANY, OR
MORTGAGE LENDER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 12-10-702;
(B) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 11-101-401;
OR
(C) A SAVINGS AND LOAN, FEDERALLY CHARTERED SAVINGS AND
LOAN ASSOCIATION, CREDIT UNION, OR FEDERAL CREDIT UNION.
(c.5) AN INSTITUTION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4)(c)(II) OF THIS
SECTION IS NOT THE TRUE LENDER OF A LOAN IF A DIFFERENT PERSON HOLDS
THE PREDOMINANT ECONOMIC INTEREST IN THE LOAN, EITHER DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, OR IF THE LOAN ARRANGEMENTS WERE STRUCTURED IN A
MANNER DESIGNED TO EVADE THE OPERATION OF THIS ARTICLE 1.
(d) "INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING" DOES NOT INCLUDE ACTIONS
BY AN INSURER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 10-1-102 (13), OR A FRATERNAL
BENEFIT SOCIETY, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 10-14-102, THAT ARE SUBJECT
TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 10-3-1104.9 AND ANY RULES ADOPTED
BY THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-1104.9.
(5) (a) "INDIVIDUALIZED WAGE SETTING" MEANS USING A PWSA OR
THE OUTPUT OF A PWSA IN DETERMINING A WAGE OFFERED TO A WORKER.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(b) "INDIVIDUALIZED WAGE SETTING" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PERSON'S DECISION NOT TO HIRE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NOT
PREVIOUSLY WORKED FOR OR THROUGH THE PERSON OR THE PERSON'S
AFFILIATES OR SUBSIDIARIES; OR
(II) PAY EQUITY STUDIES, COMPENSATION REVIEWS, OR OTHER
ACTIVITIES NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH FEDERAL AND STATE
ANTIDISCRIMINATION AND PAY EQUITY LAWS.
(6) "LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS PROGRAM" MEANS A
LOYALTY, REWARDS, OR CLUB CARD PROGRAM ESTABLISHED FOR THE
GENUINE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING BENEFITS TO CONSUMERS WHO
VOLUNTARILY PARTICIPATE IN THAT PROGRAM, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
THOSE BENEFITS ARE PROVIDED DIRECTLY BY A BUSINESS OR THROUGH A
LOYALTY PROGRAM PARTNER. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (6), "LOYALTY
PROGRAM PARTNER" MEANS A THIRD PARTY THAT PROVIDES LOYALTY,
MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS PROGRAM BENEFITS TO CONSUMERS WHO
CONSENT TO PARTICIPATE IN A LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS
PROGRAM OFFERED BY A DIFFERENT SELLER.
(7) "ONLINE BEHAVIORS" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL'S ACTIONS, HABITS,
PREFERENCES, AFFILIATIONS, ASSOCIATIONS, FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES,
OR INTERESTS THAT ARE OBSERVABLE, MEASURABLE, OR INFERRED
THROUGH DIGITAL, ONLINE, OR ELECTRONIC OBSERVATION OR
SURVEILLANCE OF A CONSUMER OR WORKER, INCLUDING ASSOCIATIONS
WITH, SIMILARITIES TO, OR DIFFERENCES FROM A GROUP, BAND, CLASS, OR
TIER OF OTHER INDIVIDUALS.
(8) "PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS" INCLUDES PERSONAL DATA, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303 (17)(a), INCLUDING PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
INFORMATION; SENSITIVE DATA, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303 (24);
GENETIC INFORMATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 10-3-1104.6 (2)(c); AND
BOTH MUTABLE AND IMMUTABLE QUALITIES, FEATURES, ATTRIBUTES, OR
TRAITS OF AN INDIVIDUAL.
(9) "PRICE" MEANS THE AMOUNT CHARGED TO A CONSUMER IN
RELATION TO A TRANSACTION, INCLUDING ALL RELATED COSTS AND FEES
AND OTHER MATERIAL TERMS OF THE TRANSACTION THAT HAVE A DIRECT
BEARING ON THE AMOUNT PAID BY THE CONSUMER.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(10) "PRICE OR WAGE SETTING ALGORITHM" OR "PWSA" MEANS ANY
TECHNOLOGY, SOFTWARE, PROGRAM, MACHINE-BASED SYSTEM, OR
COMPUTATIONAL PROCESS THAT:
(a) USES STATISTICAL MODELING, DATA ANALYTICS, ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, OR OTHER DATA PROCESSING TECHNIQUES TO ANALYZE
SURVEILLANCE DATA; AND
(b) IS A SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN SETTING, OFFERING, OR
DETERMINING A PRICE OR A WAGE OFFERED TO AN INDIVIDUAL.
(11) "SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR" MEANS MORE THAN A DE MINIMIS OR
INCIDENTAL FACTOR THAT INFORMS THE PRICE OR WAGE OFFERED TO AN
INDIVIDUAL.
(12) (a) "SURVEILLANCE DATA" MEANS DATA OBTAINED THROUGH
OBSERVATION, INFERENCE, OR SURVEILLANCE OF A CONSUMER OR WORKER
THAT IS RELATED TO PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS, ONLINE BEHAVIORS, OR
BIOMETRICS OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR A GROUP, BAND, CLASS, OR TIER TO
WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL BELONGS.
(b) "SURVEILLANCE DATA" INCLUDES INFORMATION GATHERED,
PURCHASED, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRED.
(13) "WAGE" MEANS THE MATERIAL TERMS OFFERED TO A WORKER
IN EXCHANGE FOR LABOR, INCLUDING THE AMOUNT TO BE PAID FOR THE
LABOR, WHETHER PAID BY TIME RATE, PIECE RATE, SALARY, BONUSES,
COMMISSIONS, AND OTHER INCENTIVES AND TASK ASSIGNMENTS THAT HAVE
A DIRECT IMPACT ON EARNINGS.
(14) (a) "WORKER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING WORK FOR
WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND INCLUDES AN EMPLOYEE, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 8-4-101, AND ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING WORK ON
BEHALF OF OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF AN EMPLOYER OR OTHER PERSON.
(b) "WORKER" DOES NOT INCLUDE A WORKER ENGAGED BY:
(I) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) A PUBLIC ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-10-103 (5); OR
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(III) THE STATE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-10-103 (7).
6-1-1902. Prohibition against individualized price or wage
setting - publication of procedures.
(1) Individualized price setting.
(a) A PERSON SHALL NOT ENGAGE IN INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING.
(b) A PERSON HAS NOT ENGAGED IN INDIVIDUALIZED PRICE SETTING
IF THE PERSON CAN DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(I) DIFFERENTIAL PRICES ARE JUSTIFIED BASED ON DIFFERENCES IN
COST IN PROVIDING A GOOD OR SERVICE TO DIFFERENT CONSUMERS,
INCLUDING BASED ON CONSUMER SELECTIONS, RIDE OR DELIVERY DISTANCE,
OR RIDE OR DELIVERY TIME;
(II) DIFFERENTIAL PRICES ARE JUSTIFIED BY TEMPORAL DIFFERENCES,
INCLUDING PRICE FLUCTUATIONS BASED ON SUPPLY AND DEMAND;
(III) A PUBLIC DISCOUNTED PRICE IS OFFERED ON EQUAL TERMS
PURSUANT TO PUBLICLY DISCLOSED ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA TO:
(A) ALL CONSUMERS WHO MEET THE PUBLICLY DISCLOSED
ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA, INCLUDING CRITERIA RELATED TO VOLUME
PURCHASES, SIGNING UP FOR A MAILING LIST, REGISTERING FOR
PROMOTIONAL COMMUNICATIONS, OR PARTICIPATING IN A PROMOTIONAL
EVENT; OR
(B) ALL MEMBERS OF A BROADLY DEFINED AND PUBLICLY
RECOGNIZED GROUP OF CONSUMERS, INCLUDING TEACHERS, ACTIVE OR
RETIRED MILITARY PERSONNEL, SENIOR CITIZENS, STUDENTS, OR RESIDENTS
OF A CERTAIN AREA BASED ON PUBLICLY DISCLOSED ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA;
(IV) A DISCOUNTED PRICE IS OFFERED ON EQUAL TERMS PURSUANT
TO PUBLICLY DISCLOSED TERMS AND CONDITIONS TO ALL MEMBERS,
ENROLLEES, OR PARTICIPANTS IN A LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS
PROGRAM;
(V) DIFFERENTIAL PRICES ARE OFFERED OR PROVIDED TO A
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

CONSUMER AS A GOOD FAITH CREDIT, REFUND, REBATE, OR DISCOUNT BELOW
THE PRICE PREVIOUSLY OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER IN RESPONSE TO:
(A) A CONSUMER'S COMPLAINT, INQUIRY, OR EXPRESSION OF
DISSATISFACTION REGARDING A GOOD OR SERVICE;
(B) A SERVICE DISRUPTION, ERROR, OR OTHER FAILURE TO DELIVER
A GOOD OR SERVICE AS PROMISED OR EXPECTED;
(C) A BILLING DISPUTE OR DISCREPANCY;
(D) A REQUEST FOR ACCOUNT RETENTION OR CANCELLATION; OR
(E) OTHER CUSTOMER SERVICE INTERACTIONS IN WHICH THE PERSON
PROVIDES A CREDIT, REFUND, REBATE, OR DISCOUNT BELOW THE PRICE
PREVIOUSLY OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER TO ADDRESS A CONSUMER'S
CONCERNS, TO MAINTAIN THE CONSUMER RELATIONSHIP, OR TO RETAIN
CONSUMERS;
(VI) DIFFERENTIAL PRICES ARE OFFERED PURSUANT TO THE
FOLLOWING ESTABLISHED NEED-BASED DISCOUNT PROGRAMS THAT ARE
PUBLICLY DISCLOSED AND STRUCTURED TO PROVIDE REDUCED PRICING OR
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE BASED ON OBJECTIVE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA RELATED
TO INCOME OR FINANCIAL NEED:
(A) HOSPITAL DISCOUNTED CARE;
(B) SLIDING SCALE FEES; OR
(C) CHARITY CARE OR MEDICAL FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICIES;
(VII) THE PERSON AND CONSUMER HAVE A SUBSCRIPTION OR OTHER
CONTINUOUS AGREEMENT THAT INCLUDES A MONTHLY OR OTHER
RECURRING PRICE THAT WAS NOT INFORMED BY A PWSA; OR
(VIII) A REFUSAL TO EXTEND CREDIT ON SPECIFIC TERMS OR THE
REFUSAL TO ENTER INTO A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION WITH A SPECIFIC
CONSUMER IS BASED ON DATA PROVIDED IN A CONSUMER REPORT COVERED
BY THE FEDERAL "FAIR CREDIT REPORTING ACT", 15 U.S.C. SEC. 1681 ET
SEQ., OR REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR THE
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

FINANCIAL TRANSACTION.
(2) Individualized wage setting.
(a) A PERSON SHALL NOT ENGAGE IN INDIVIDUALIZED WAGE SETTING.
(b) A PERSON HAS NOT ENGAGED IN INDIVIDUALIZED WAGE SETTING
IF THE PERSON CAN DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(I) THE PERSON OFFERS INDIVIDUALIZED WAGES BASED SOLELY ON
DATA SPECIFIC TO THE INDIVIDUAL WORKER THAT IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO:
(A) WORKER SENIORITY; OR
(B) THE TASKS THE WORKER WAS HIRED TO PERFORM, INCLUDING
DATA ASSOCIATED WITH A WORKER'S PERFORMANCE OR GENERATION OF
NEW BUSINESS; AND
(II) THE PERSON DISCLOSES IN PLAIN LANGUAGE BEFORE HIRING A
WORKER TO PERFORM WORK, AND TO ALL WORKERS WHOSE WAGES ARE SET
IN WHOLE OR IN PART THROUGH A PRICE OR WAGE SETTING ALGORITHM,
WHAT DATA IS CONSIDERED AND HOW THE PRICE OR WAGE SETTING
ALGORITHM CONSIDERS THE DATA. TO THE EXTENT THESE DISCLOSURES
DUPLICATE DISCLOSURES REQUIRED UNDER EQUAL PAY, WAGE AND HOUR,
OR OTHER EXISTING LAWS, A PERSON'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) MAY BE FULFILLED BY COMPLYING WITH APPLICABLE
LAW.
(3) Publication of procedures. A PERSON THAT USES A PRICE OR
WAGE SETTING ALGORITHM SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH REASONABLE
PROCEDURES:
(a) TO ENSURE THE ACCURACY OF ALL DATA CONSIDERED BY THE
PRICE OR WAGE SETTING ALGORITHM;
(b) FOR WORKERS TO REQUEST AND RECEIVE INFORMATION
REGARDING WHAT DATA IS CONSIDERED BY THE PRICE OR WAGE SETTING
ALGORITHM AND HOW THE PRICE OR WAGE SETTING ALGORITHM CONSIDERS
THE DATA WHEN SETTING PARTICULAR WAGES; AND
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(c) TO ALLOW A WORKER TO CORRECT OR CHALLENGE THE
ACCURACY OF DATA CONSIDERED BY THE PRICE OR WAGE SETTING
ALGORITHM.
6-1-1903. Rule-making authority.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY FOR THE
PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING AND ENFORCING THIS PART 19.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1210

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1210